Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1520.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "athlete agent" in section 2002-M of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2002-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Agency contract." As defined in 5 Pa.C.S. § 3502 (relating to definitions)."Athlete agent." As defined in 5 Pa.C.S. § 3502 [(relating to definitions)]."Athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports." The term includes the NCAA and any individual or entity designated to enforce conference or athletic association rules.* * *"NIL." The name, image, likeness or athletic reputation property rights of a prospective college student athlete or a college student athlete."NIL collective." A group of two or more individuals or entities that collaborate to arrange or enter into lawful NIL agreements with a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete at a particular institution or pay NIL compensation to prospective college student athletes or college student athletes conditioned on their attendance at a particular institution."NIL compensation." The compensation of a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete in exchange for use of the prospective college student athlete or college student athlete's NIL. The term includes compensation for speech protected by the First Amendment of the Constitution of the United States."Parties." Legal signatories in an agency contract that includes an athlete agent and the legal signatory or signatories of a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete who the athlete agent will represent."Prospective college student athlete." An individual who is 20250HB1520PN1790 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recruited by an institution to participate as a current athlete on at least one intercollegiate team but has not yet enrolled at the postsecondary institution."Third party." A person or entity that is not an institution, a conference or an athletic association that pays NIL compensation.Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 2002.1-M. Rights of parties.(a) Generally.--A prospective college student athlete and a current college student athlete has the right to:(1) Enter into an agency contract and secure representation in relation to legal and professional matters.(2) Enter into an NIL agreement with and receive NIL compensation directly from an institution, athletic program supporter, NIL collective and third party.(b) Prohibition.--(1) An institution, athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports, and any individual or entity representing them, are prohibited from:(i) Serving as an athlete agent for a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete.(ii) Attempting to influence a prospective college student athlete or current college student athlete's selection of an athlete agent.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an institution may arrange or help arrange an NIL agreement and NIL compensation for a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete, but may not collect a commission for an NIL activity.20250HB1520PN1790 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) An institution athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports, any individual or entity representing them and any of their business partners are prohibited from directly or indirectly interfering with lawful communications between a college student athlete and an athlete agent when a college student athlete is not participating in mandatory athletic activities.(c) Enforcement.--This article shall not limit the right of an institution of higher education to establish and enforce any of the following:(1) Academic standards, requirements, regulations or obligations for the institution of higher education's college student athletes.(2) Team rules of conduct and other rules of conduct generally applicable to all college student athletes.(3) Standards or policies regarding the governance or operation of, or participation in, intercollegiate athletics that do not conflict with this article.(4) Disciplinary rules and standards generally applicable to all students of the institution of higher education.(d) Conflicts.--(1) An institution of higher education may prohibit a current college student athlete's involvement in NIL activities that conflict with existing institutional sponsorship arrangements at the time the college student athlete discloses a contract to the institution of higher education as required under subsection (e).(2) An institution of higher education may prohibit a 20250HB1520PN1790 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 college student athlete's involvement in NIL activities with persons in an industry that the institution does not do business due to a conflict with institutional values.(3) An institution of higher education shall have policies that specify the NIL activities in which current college student athletes may not engage under this article.(e) Disclosure.--(1) A current college student athlete who proposes to enter into a contract providing compensation to the college student athlete for use of the college student athlete's NIL rights shall disclose the contents of the contract prior to execution of the contract to an official of the institution of higher education who is designated by the institution of higher education.(2) An institution of higher education shall have policies that specify when to disclose the contract and the contents of the contract in accordance with paragraph (1).(3) If an institution of higher education receives direct financial compensation from a third party arising from the third party's contract with a prospective college student athlete or a current college student athlete relating to the use of the NIL of a prospective college student athlete or current college student athlete, the institution shall disclose in a timely manner the financial relationship between the institution and the third party to the college student athlete.(f) This section shall not apply to compensation received by the institution of higher education for the use of the institution's intellectual property.Section 2002.2-M. Prohibitions on institutions.20250HB1520PN1790 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 An institution is prohibited from:(1) Imposing or complying with a contract, regulation, standard, rule, including rules of an athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports or other requirement that would:(i) Restrict or prohibit a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete from entering into an agency contract with an athlete agent.(ii) Restrict or prohibit a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete from earning NIL compensation for an NIL activity conducted during the athlete's free time.(iii) Require a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete to refrain from exercising the athlete's rights specified in this article.(iv) Restrict or prohibit the institution, an athletic program supporter, an NIL collective or third party from entering into an NIL agreement with a prospective college student athlete or a college student athlete.(v) Restrict or prohibit the institution, an athletic program supporter, an NIL collective or third party from paying NIL compensation to a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete.(vi) Restrict or prohibit the institution, an athletic program supporter, an NIL collective or third party from conditioning an NIL agreement or NIL compensation to a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete on attendance at a particular institution or membership on a particular intercollegiate 20250HB1520PN1790 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 athletics sports team.(2) Penalizing or threatening, in any way, a prospective college student athlete, a college student athlete, an athlete agent, an NIL collective or a third party for activities authorized by this article.(3) Complying with an investigation, regulation or rule of an athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports related to an agency contract, NIL agreement, NIL compensation or NIL activity.(4) Reporting information about prospective college student athletes' or college student athletes' NIL agreements or NIL compensation, individually or in aggregate, to an athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports.(5) Reducing, canceling or not renewing an athletic scholarship because a college student athlete enters into an NIL agreement or earns NIL compensation permitted by this article.(6) Using the terms of an athletic scholarship as a reason to impair a college student athlete's NIL rights, except as expressly provided in this section.(7) Directly or indirectly circumventing any provision of this article.Section 2002.3-M. Athletic associations, conferences and organizations with authority over intercollegiate sports.(a) Prohibitions.--An athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports may not:(1) Authorize, cause or require an institution to take an action prohibited by this article.20250HB1520PN1790 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Accept a complaint, open an investigation, threaten a penalty, impose a penalty or take any other adverse action against a prospective college student athlete, a college student athlete, an athlete agent, an institution, an athletic program supporter, an NIL collective or a third party as a result of engaging in activities protected by this article.(3) Prohibit, restrict or interfere with the right of a prospective college student athlete, a college student athlete, an athlete agent, an institution, an athletic program supporter, an NIL collective or a third party to engage in activities authorized by this article.(4) Require a prospective college student athlete, a college student athlete, an athlete agent, an institution, an athletic program supporter, an NIL collective or third party to report information about an NIL agreement or NIL compensation to an athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports.(b) Right of action.--(1) A prospective college student athlete, a college student athlete, an athlete agent, an institution and its supporting foundations, an entity acting on behalf of an institution, an athletic program supporter, an NIL collective or a third party that is subjected to an actual or threatened complaint, investigation, penalty or other adverse action of an athletic association, conference or other organization with authority over intercollegiate sports for engaging in an activity authorized under this article may bring an action to recover damages and reasonable attorney fees, may seek injunctive relief and may seek any other remedy available by 20250HB1520PN1790 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 law.(2) The Attorney General may seek injunctive relief and damages to be paid to persons injured as a result of a violation of this article.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an institution, an athletic program supporter, an NIL collective or a third party to enter into an NIL agreement with, facilitate or pay NIL compensation to a prospective college student athlete or college student athlete.Section 2002.4-M. NIL agreements.(a) Requirements.--An NIL collective, an institution or a third party that agrees to pay at least $5,000 in NIL compensation to a college student athlete in a calendar year must first enter into a written agreement that includes all of the following:(1) The legal name, physical address and telephone number of the individual or individuals or entity or entities that are legally responsible for paying NIL compensation.(2) The amount of all NIL compensation payments, including the grand total of the NIL compensation, and any other benefits that will be paid to the college student athlete.(3) When each NIL compensation payment will be made.(4) All of the college student athlete's NIL obligations required to receive the NIL compensation.(5) The beginning and end date of the agreement.(6) Any options parties have for revising, extending or terminating the agreement.(7) Any term of the agreement that would allow the NIL collective, institution or third party to not pay the athlete 20250HB1520PN1790 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a portion of the NIL compensation.(b) Confidential.--An institution's NIL agreement and NIL compensation is not a public record subject to inspection and duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(c) Royalty payments required.--(1) A person that produces a college team jersey, a college team video game or college team trading cards for the purpose of making a profit shall make a royalty payment to each college student athlete whose NIL or other individually identifiable feature is used.(2) An institution is prohibited from owning, controlling or sublicensing college student athletes' NIL group licensing rights for college team video games, jerseys, or trading cards.(d) Use of trademarks.--This act shall not establish or grant a right to a college student athlete to use the name, trademarks, service marks, logos, symbols or any other intellectual property, registered or unregistered, of an institution of higher education, athletic association, conference or other group or organization with authority over intercollegiate athletics, in furtherance of the college student athlete's opportunities to earn compensation for the college student athlete's use of the college student athlete's NIL rights.Section 2002.5-M. Athlete agents and upfront payments.(a) Prohibited persons.--An athlete agent may not enter into an agency contract if the athlete agent has a pending charge or is listed as a defendant in a case, excluding divorce, in Federal or State civil judgment at the time parties execute the 20250HB1520PN1790 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency contract or has been convicted of any of the following:(1) An offense classified as a felony, regardless of the date.(2) An offense classified as a misdemeanor, prior to parties' execution of the agency contract, if the offense involves:(i) physical contact with another person or another person's property;(ii) an element of deception; or(iii) gambling or sports wagering.(3) More than one alcohol or drug offense.(4) More than one misdemeanor offense.(5) A conviction for a crime that involves violence, regardless of the classification.(b) Written acknowledgment.--The athlete agent cannot enter into an agency contract if the athlete agent does not secure a written acknowledgment from the prospective college student athlete or college student athlete, prior to parties' execution of an agency contract that includes:(1) The athlete agent's legal name, current address and telephone number.(2) A list of the names and residential addresses of all persons financially interested in the operation of the agency business of the athlete agent, whether as employees, partners, investors, associates or profit sharers or in any other manner.(3) A statement that the contract does not obligate the prospective college student athlete or the current college student athlete to use the athlete agent for any service beyond professional representation in relation to the use of 20250HB1520PN1790 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NIL.(c) Prohibited payment.--The athlete agent provides payment, including a loan or recoupable payment, to the prospective college student athlete or college student athlete or to the athlete's relative in exchange for the prospective college student athlete or college student athlete entering into the agent contract.(d) Notification required by athlete agent.--Within five calendar days, an athlete agent must notify all prospective college student athlete and college student athlete clients if the athlete agent no longer meets all requirements and conditions for operating as an athlete agent in any state that the athlete agent was previously legally authorized to operate as an athlete agent.(e) Repayments prohibited.--(1) A prospective college student athlete or college student athlete who enters into an agreement with an athlete agent is not required to pay the athlete agent a commission, fee or to reimburse costs or repay funds or loans to the athlete agent.(2) An agreement in violation of paragraph (1) shall be void and unenforceable if the athlete agent does not comply with subsection (b).(f) Family members.--A spouse, parent, sibling, grandparent or legal guardian of a prospective college student athlete or a college student athlete is not required to meet requirements or obligations of an athlete agent to assist the athlete in negotiating an NIL agreement.(g) Other agreements prohibited.--(1) An agreement that offers or provides a prospective 20250HB1520PN1790 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 college student athlete, college student athlete or the athlete's parent or legal guardian an upfront payment or benefit in exchange for future professional sports earnings is void and prohibited.(2) An athlete agency agreement that grants an athlete agent the athlete's NIL rights, including group licensing rights and continues beyond the intercollegiate athletics eligibility of the prospective college student athlete or a current college student athlete is void and prohibited.Section 2002.6-M. Athletic program structure.An entity created or contracted by an institution to operate or otherwise control parts of its intercollegiate athletic programs that are related to this act shall have the same rights, protections, prohibitions and responsibilities applicable to the institution as described in this act.Section 2002.7-M. Protections and right to adjudicate.A college student athlete, institution of higher education, conference, or athletic association may not be deprived of a protection provided under State law with respect to a controversy that arises in this Commonwealth and shall have the right to adjudication in this Commonwealth of a claim that arises in this Commonwealth.Section 2002.8-M. Private civil action.In addition to the right established in section 2002.3-M, a college student athlete shall have the right to bring a private civil action against a person that violates this article. The court shall award costs and reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff in an action brought under this section.Section 2002.9-M. Settlements.A legal settlement cannot void any part of this article.20250HB1520PN1790 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2002.10-M. Severability.The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or the application of any provisions of this article is held to be invalid, that invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or application of any other provision that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1520PN1790 - 14 - 12345678